fi: Kilpa-autoilun laji: Aavikkokilpailu; Kiihdytysajo; Mäkinousu; Jäärata-ajo; Ovaalirata / stock truck; Rally raid; Moottorirata-ajo; Rock racing; Short course off-road; Time attack; Muu
vi: bộ môn xe tải đua: Đua sa mạc; Đua drag; Đua leo đồi; Đua trên băng; Đua vòng tròn oval/Xe tải nguyên bản; Rally raid; Đường đua khép kín; Đua địa hình đá; Địa hình chặng ngắn; Đua tính giờ; Khác
es: Disciplina de camiones de carreras: Carreras en el desierto; Carreras de aceleración; Carreras de montaña; Carreras sobre hielo; Pista ovalada/Stock truck; Rally raid; Circuito cerrado; Carreras de rocas; Circuito corto todoterreno; Contrarreloj; Otro
nl: Race truck discipline: Woestijnracen; Dragracen; Heuvelklim; IJsracen; Oval-/stocktruck; Rally-raid; Roadcourse; Rockracen; Shortcourse offroad; Time attack; Overig
da: Disciplin for racing-lastbil: Ørkenløb; Dragracing; Hill climb; Isløb; Ovalbane/stock truck; Rally raid; Racerbane; Rock racing; Short course offroad; Time attack; Andet
ko: 레이싱 트럭 종목: 사막 레이싱; 드래그 레이싱; 힐 클라임; 아이스 레이싱; 오벌/스톡 트럭; 랠리 레이드; 로드 코스; 록 레이싱; 쇼트 코스 오프로드; 타임 어택; 기타
zh-CN: 赛车卡车赛事类别: 沙漠赛; 直线加速赛; 爬山赛; 冰上赛车; 椭圆赛道/量产卡车; 越野拉力赛; 公路赛; 攀岩赛; 短道越野赛; 计时挑战赛; 其他
lt-LT: Lenktyninio sunkvežimio disciplina: Dykumų lenktynės; Drago lenktynės; Kopimo į kalną lenktynės; Ledo lenktynės; Ovalo / serijinių sunkvežimių lenktynės; Ralio reidas; Žiedinės lenktynės trasoje; Lenktynės uolomis; Trumpos trasos bekelės lenktynės; „Time attack“; Kita
de: Renntruck-Disziplin: Wüstenrennen; Drag Racing; Bergrennen; Eisrennen; Oval-/Stock-Truck; Rallye Raid; Straßenkurs; Rock Racing; Short-Course Offroad; Time Attack; Sonstige
en: Racing truck discipline: Desert racing; Drag racing; Hill climb; Ice racing; Oval/stock truck; Rally raid; Road course; Rock racing; Short course off-road; Time attack; Other
it: Disciplina dei camion da corsa: Corse nel deserto; Gara di accelerazione; Cronoscalata; Corse su ghiaccio; Circuito ovale/stock truck; Rally raid; Circuito stradale; Corse su rocce; Fuoristrada short course; Time attack; Altro
ro-RO: Disciplina camioanelor de curse: Curse în deșert; Curse de accelerare (drag racing); Coastă (hill climb); Curse pe gheață; Curse pe circuit oval/stock truck; Raliu raid; Curse pe circuit stradal; Curse pe stânci; Curse scurte off-road; Time attack; Altele
fr: Discipline de camion de course: Course dans le désert; Course de dragster; Course de côte; Course sur glace; Ovale/stock-truck; Rallye-raid; Course sur circuit; Rock racing; Course tout-terrain sur circuit court; Time attack; Autre
sv: Racingdisciplin för lastbil: Ökenracing; Dragracing; Backtävling; Isracing; Oval-/stocktruck; Rally raid; Banracing; Rockracing; Short course offroad; Time attack; Övrigt
hu: Versenyteherautó versenyzési formája: Sivatagi versenyzés; Gyorsulási versenyzés; Hegyi felfutó; Jégversenyzés; Ovál/széria kamion; Rally raid; Országúti pálya; Sziklamászó versenyzés; Rövid pályás terepverseny; Time attack; Egyéb
th: การแข่งขันรถบรรทุก: แข่งขันในทะเลทราย; แข่งขันทางตรง; ไต่เขา; แข่งขันบนน้ำแข็ง; สนามวงรี/รถกระบะเดิมๆ; แรลลีเรด; แข่งขันทางเรียบ; แข่งขันปีนหิน; ออฟโรดระยะสั้น; แข่งขันทำเวลา; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 賽車卡車項目: 沙漠賽; 直線競速賽; 爬山賽; 冰上賽; 橢圓賽道/原廠卡車賽; 越野拉力賽; 公路賽道; 攀岩賽; 短道越野賽; 計時賽; 其他
pl: Dyscyplina wyścigów ciężarówek: Wyścigi pustynne; Drag racing; Wyścigi górskie; Wyścigi na lodzie; Wyścigi na owalu / stock truck; Rajdy terenowe; Wyścigi torowe; Rock racing; Krótkotorowe wyścigi terenowe; Time attack; Inne
pt-BR: Caminhão de corrida disciplina: Corrida no deserto; Corrida de arrancada; Subida de montanha; Corrida no gelo; Oval/stock truck; Rali cross-country; Circuito de rua; Corrida em rochas; Off-road em pista curta; Contra-relógio; Outros
cs: Disciplína závodních trucků: Pouštní závody; Závody dragsterů; Závody do vrchu; Závody na ledu; Závody na oválu / stock truck; Rallye raid; Silniční závody; Závody na skalách; Krátké tratě off-road; Time attack; Ostatní
sk-SK: Disciplína pretekárskych nákladných áut: Púštne preteky; Preteky v šprinte; Preteky do vrchu; Preteky na ľade; Ovál/sériové ťahače; Rely raid; Cestný okruh; Preteky na skalách; Krátky terénny okruh; Časovka; Iné
nb: Disiplin for racinglastebiler: Ørkenracing; Dragracing; Bakkeklatring; Isracing; Ovalbane/stock-truck; Rally raid; Baneracing; Fjellracing; Kortbane offroad; Time attack; Annet
ru: Дисциплина гоночного грузовика: Гонки по пустыне; Дрэг-рейсинг; Хиллклаймб; Гонки по льду; Овальные гонки/сток-трак; Ралли-рейд; Шоссейно-кольцевая трасса; Рок-рейсинг; Шорт-корс (бездорожье); Тайм-аттак; Другое
ja: レーシングトラック競技: デザートレーシング; ドラッグレーシング; ヒルクライム; アイスレーシング; オーバル/ストックトラック; ラリーレイド; ロードコース; ロックレーシング; ショートコースオフロード; タイムアタック; その他
bg-BG: Дисциплина на състезателен камион: Пустинни състезания; Драг рейсинг; Планинско изкачване; Състезания на лед; Овална писта/стандартен камион; Рали рейд; Шосейни състезания; Рок рейсинг; Офроуд на къси трасета; Тайм атак; Друго
hr-HR: Disciplina utrka kamiona: Pustinjske utrke; Drag utrke; Brdske utrke; Utrke na ledu; Ovalne utrke / serijski kamioni; Rally raid; Kružne utrke; Utrke po stijenama; Kratke terenske utrke; Utrka na vrijeme (Time attack); Ostalo
pt-PT: Modalidade de corridas de camiões: Corridas no deserto; Provas de arranque; Subida de rampa; Corridas no gelo; Camião de circuito oval/stock; Rally raid; Circuito de estrada; Rock racing; Off-road de circuito curto; Time attack; Outro
tr: Yarış kamyonu disiplini: Çöl yarışı; Drag yarışı; Tırmanma yarışı; Buz yarışı; Oval/stok kamyon; Ralli raid; Yol pisti; Kaya yarışı; Kısa pist off-road; Zamana karşı yarış; Diğer
el: Κατηγορία αγωνιστικών φορτηγών: Αγώνες ερήμου; Αγώνες dragster; Ανάβαση; Αγώνες σε πάγο; Οβάλ/στοκ φορτηγά; Rally raid; Αγώνες πίστας; Αγώνες βράχων; Short course off-road; Time attack; Άλλο
sl-SI: Disciplina dirkalnih tovornjakov: Puščavske dirke; Drag dirke; Gorsko-hitrostne dirke; Dirke na ledu; Ovalne steze/serijski tovornjaki; Rally raid; Cestne dirke; Rock dirke (po skalah); Kratke terenske dirke; Time attack; Drugo